Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1096.
do enact as follows:SB1096,11Section 1. 20.515 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,2,5220.515 (1) (g) Benefit and coverage payments; private individuals. All moneys 3received from individuals under s. 40.516 (1) (a) who elect coverage under any 4health care coverage plan offered under s. 40.51 (6) for the payment of benefits and 5the cost of administering benefits for those individuals.SB1096,26Section 2. 20.515 (1) (gm) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,2,11720.515 (1) (gm) Benefit and coverage payments; private employers. All moneys 8received from private employers under s. 40.516 (2) (b) 1. who elect to provide 9coverage to their employees under any health care coverage plan offered under s. 1040.51 (6) for the payment of benefits and the cost of administering benefits for 11employees of those private employers.SB1096,312Section 3. 20.515 (1) (h) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,3,21320.515 (1) (h) Health savings account plan; private individuals. All moneys 14received from individuals under s. 40.515 (3) (b) relating to the establishment and 15operation of health savings accounts under s. 40.515 (1m) for individuals who elect 16coverage under s. 40.516 (1) and who select a high-deductible health plan, to be 1used for the payment of expenses related to health savings accounts for such 2individuals. SB1096,43Section 4. 20.515 (1) (i) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,3,9420.515 (1) (i) Health savings account plan; private employers. All moneys 5received from private employers under s. 40.515 (3) (c) relating to the establishment 6and operation of health savings accounts under s. 40.515 (1m) for private employers 7who elect coverage for their employees under s. 40.516 (2) and whose employees 8select a high-deductible health plan, to be used for the payment of expenses related 9to health savings accounts for such employees of private employers.SB1096,510Section 5. 20.515 (1) (tm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1096,3,141120.515 (1) (tm) Health savings account plan. All moneys deposited in the 12public employee trust fund relating to the establishment and operation of health 13savings accounts under s. 40.515 (1) to be used for the payment of expenses relating 14to health savings accounts for state employees.SB1096,615Section 6. 40.03 (6) (k) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1096,3,181640.03 (6) (k) Shall establish health savings accounts for state employees who 17select a high-deductible health plan under s. 40.515 (1) for their health care 18coverage plan.SB1096,719Section 7. 40.03 (6) (km) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,3,222040.03 (6) (km) Shall establish health savings accounts for individuals who 21select a high-deductible health plan under s. 40.515 (1m) for their health care 22coverage plan.SB1096,823Section 8. 40.03 (6) (kp) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,4,22440.03 (6) (kp) Shall establish health savings accounts for individuals whose 1private employers elect to offer coverage under s. 40.516 (2) and who select a high-2deductible health plan under s. 40.515 (1m) for their health care coverage plan.SB1096,93Section 9. 40.04 (12) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1096,4,7440.04 (12) The department shall establish and maintain a separate account 5in the fund to which shall be credited all moneys received from employees and 6employers in connection with health savings accounts established for state 7employees under s. 40.515 (1).SB1096,108Section 10. 40.04 (13) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,4,12940.04 (13) The department shall establish and maintain a separate account to 10which shall be credited all moneys received under s. 40.515 (3) (b) in connection 11with health savings accounts established under s. 40.515 (1m) for individuals who 12elect coverage under s. 40.516 (1) and who select a high-deductible health plan.SB1096,1113Section 11. 40.04 (14) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,4,181440.04 (14) The department shall establish and maintain a separate account to 15which shall be credited all moneys received under s. 40.515 (3) (c) in connection 16with health savings accounts established under s. 40.515 (1m) for employees of 17private employers who elect coverage for their employees under s. 40.516 (2) and 18whose employees select a high-deductible health plan.SB1096,1219Section 12. 40.51 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1096,5,22040.51 (1) The procedures and provisions pertaining to enrollment, premium 21transmitted and coverage of eligible employees, individuals who elect coverage 22under s. 40.516 (1), private employers that elect coverage for their employees under 23s. 40.516 (2), and employees of private employers that elect coverage under s. 40.516 1(2) for health care benefits shall be established by contract or rule except as 2otherwise specifically provided by this chapter.SB1096,133Section 13. 40.515 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1096,5,13440.515 (1) In addition to the health care coverage plans offered under s. 40.51 5(6), beginning on January 1, 2015, the group insurance board shall offer to all state 6employees the option of receiving health care coverage through a high-deductible 7health plan and the establishment of a health savings account. Under this option, 8each state employee shall receive health care coverage through a high-deductible 9health plan. The state shall make contributions into each state employee’s health 10savings account in an amount specified by the administrator of the division of 11personnel management in the department of administration under s. 40.05 (4) (ah) 124. In designing a high-deductible health plan, the group insurance board shall 13ensure that the plan may be used in conjunction with a health savings account.SB1096,1414Section 14. 40.515 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,5,231540.515 (1m) Beginning on January 1 following the effective date of this 16subsection .... [LRB inserts date], the group insurance board shall offer to all 17individuals who are eligible to elect coverage under s. 40.516 (1) or who receive 18coverage through a private employer under s. 40.516 (2) the option of receiving 19health care coverage through a high-deductible health plan under sub. (1) and the 20establishment of a health savings account. The state may not make any 21contribution to a health savings account on behalf of an individual who elects 22coverage under s. 40.516 (1) or who receives coverage through a private employer 23under s. 40.516 (2).SB1096,151Section 15. 40.515 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 40.515 (3) (a) and 2amended to read:SB1096,6,8340.515 (3) (a) The group insurance board may collect fees from state agencies 4to pay all administrative costs relating to the establishment and operation of health 5savings accounts established for state employees under this section sub. (1). The 6group insurance board shall develop a methodology for determining each state 7agency’s share of the administrative costs. Moneys collected under this subsection 8paragraph shall be credited to the appropriation account under s. 20.515 (1) (tm).SB1096,169Section 16. 40.515 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,6,171040.515 (3) (b) The group insurance board shall collect fees from individuals to 11pay all administrative costs relating to the establishment and operation of health 12savings accounts established under sub. (1m) for individuals who elect coverage 13under s. 40.516 (1) and who select a high-deductible health plan. The group 14insurance board shall develop a methodology for determining the share of the 15administrative costs related to those individuals and each individual’s share of the 16administrative costs. Moneys collected under this paragraph shall be credited to 17the appropriation account under s. 20.515 (1) (h).SB1096,1718Section 17. 40.515 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,7,31940.515 (3) (c) The group insurance board shall collect fees from private 20employers to pay all administrative costs relating to the establishment and 21operation of health savings accounts established under sub. (1m) for employees of 22private employers who receive coverage under s. 40.516 (2) and who select a high-23deductible health plan. The group insurance board shall develop a methodology for 24determining the share of the administrative costs related to those private employers 1and each private employer’s share of the administrative costs. Moneys collected 2under this paragraph shall be credited to the appropriation account under s. 20.515 3(1) (i).SB1096,184Section 18. 40.516 of the statutes is created to read:SB1096,7,10540.516 Health care coverage for private individuals. (1) In this 6subsection, “individual” includes a family. Beginning on January 1 following the 7effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], any individual in this state 8who is not otherwise eligible for health care coverage under this subchapter may 9elect coverage under any health care coverage plan offered under s. 40.51 (6) or 1040.515 (1m), subject to all of the following conditions:SB1096,7,1311(a) The individual pays to the department the full cost of the required 12premiums for the health care coverage. All moneys collected under this paragraph 13shall be deposited in the appropriation account under s. 20.515 (1) (g).SB1096,7,1414(b) The individual signs a one-year agreement for health care coverage.SB1096,7,1715(c) If the individual terminates health care coverage under this section before 16the expiration of the agreement under par. (b), the individual may not receive 17health care coverage under this section for one year following the termination date.SB1096,7,1918(2) (a) In this subsection, “private employer” means any person who is not an 19employer, as defined in s. 40.02 (28).SB1096,7,2420(b) Beginning on January 1 following the effective date of this paragraph .... 21[LRB inserts date], a private employer located in this state may elect coverage for 22the private employer’s employees who reside in this state under any health care 23coverage plan offered under s. 40.51 (6) or 40.515 (1m), subject to all of the following 24conditions:SB1096,8,411. The private employer pays to the department the full cost of the required 2premiums for the private employer’s employees who elect the health care coverage. 3All moneys collected under this subdivision shall be deposited in the appropriation 4account under s. 20.515 (1) (gm).SB1096,8,552. The private employer signs a two-year agreement for health care coverage.SB1096,8,963. If the private employer terminates its health care coverage contract under 7this section before the expiration of the agreement under par. (b), the employer may 8not receive health care coverage for its employees under this paragraph for one year 9following the termination date. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1096 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1096 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1096 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1096 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1096: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting